Maryland, session 2026, SB0758.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Corporations and Associations
5–6B–23.
(a) In this section, “candidate sign” means a sign on behalf of a candidate for
public office or a slate of candidates for public office.
(b) Except as provided in subsection (c) of this section, a recorded covenant or
restriction, a provision in a declaration, or a provision in the bylaws or rules of a cooperative
housing corporation may not prohibit or restrict the display of:
(1) A candidate sign; or
(2) A sign that advertises the support or defeat of any question submitted
to the voters in accordance with the Election Law Article.
– 1 –

Ch. 288 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(c) A recorded covenant or restriction, a provision in a declaration, or a provision
in the bylaws or rules of a cooperative housing corporation may restrict the display of a
candidate sign or a sign that advertises the support or defeat of any proposition:
(1) In any areas constituting those portions of a cooperative project
possessed in common by the members;
(2) In accordance with provisions of federal, State, and local law; or
(3) If a limitation to the time period during which signs may be displayed
is not specified by a law governing the jurisdiction in which the cooperative housing
corporation is located, to a time period not less than:
(i) 1. [30] 45 DAYS BEFORE THE START OF EARLY VOTING
FOR A PRIMARY ELECTION, GENERAL ELECTION, OR VOTE ON THE PROPOSITION; OR
2. IF THERE IS NO EARLY VOTING, 45 days before the
primary election, general election, or vote on the proposition; and
(ii) 7 days after the primary election, general election, or vote on the
proposition.
Article – Real Property
11–111.2.
(a) In this section, “candidate sign” means a sign on behalf of a candidate for
public office or a slate of candidates for public office.
(b) Except as provided in subsection (c) of this section, a recorded covenant or
restriction, a provision in a declaration, or a provision in the bylaws or rules of a
condominium may not restrict or prohibit the display of:
(1) A candidate sign; or
(2) A sign that advertises the support or defeat of any question submitted
to voters in accordance with the Election Law Article.
(c) A recorded covenant or restriction, a provision in a declaration, or a provision
in the bylaws or rules of a condominium may restrict the display of a candidate sign or a
sign that advertises the support or defeat of any proposition:
(1) In the common elements;
(2) In accordance with provisions of federal, State, and local law; or
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 288
(3) If a limitation to the time period during which signs may be displayed
is not specified by a law of the jurisdiction in which the condominium is located, to a time
period not less than:
(i) 1. [30] 45 DAYS BEFORE THE START OF EARLY VOTING
FOR A PRIMARY ELECTION, GENERAL ELECTION, OR VOTE ON THE PROPOSITION; OR
2. IF THERE IS NO EARLY VOTING, 45 days before the
primary election, general election, or vote on the proposition; and
(ii) 7 days after the primary election, general election, or vote on the
proposition.
11B–111.2.
(a) In this section, “candidate sign” means a sign on behalf of a candidate for
public office or a slate of candidates for public office.
(b) Except as provided in subsection (c) of this section, a recorded covenant or
restriction, a provision in a declaration, or a provision in the bylaws or rules of a
homeowners association may not restrict or prohibit the display of:
(1) A candidate sign; or
(2) A sign that advertises the support or defeat of any question submitted
to the voters in accordance with the Election Law Article.
(c) A recorded covenant or restriction, a provision in a declaration, or a provision
in the bylaws or rules of a homeowners association may restrict the display of a candidate
sign or a sign that advertises the support or defeat of any proposition:
(1) In the common areas;
(2) In accordance with provisions of federal, State, and local law; or
(3) If a limitation to the time period during which signs may be displayed
is not specified by a law of the jurisdiction in which the homeowners association is located,
to a time period not less than:
(i) 1. [30] 45 DAYS BEFORE THE START OF EARLY VOTING
FOR A PRIMARY ELECTION, GENERAL ELECTION, OR VOTE ON THE PROPOSITION; OR
2. IF THERE IS NO EARLY VOTING, 45 days before the
primary election, general election, or vote on the proposition; and
– 3 –

Ch. 288 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(ii) 7 days after the primary election, general election, or vote on the
proposition.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act is an emergency
measure, is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public health or safety, has
been passed by a yea and nay vote supported by three–fifths of all the members elected to
each of the two Houses of the General Assembly, and shall take effect from the date it is
enacted.
Approved by the Governor, April 28, 2026.
– 4 –